California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) No other agency in the County of San Diego may apply for grants for funding significant expansion activities, including, but not limited to, specific efforts to increase air capacity, unless the application is first approved by the authority as being consistent with the regional air transportation plan adopted by the authority.

(b) Unless action is taken pursuant to Section 170068, publicly owned airports in the County of San Diego, other than the San Diego International Airport, shall not be considered to be under the control of the authority for purposes of application for, or receipt of grants for, regular operational maintenance and upgrade projects adopted pursuant to Section 21670.3.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 19.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170068.

The authority may only accept the transfer of ownership of other publicly owned airports in the County of San Diego upon initiation by the respective airport operator. Any transfer shall include the preparation of a transition plan to ensure the orderly transfer of assets and obligations. In accepting a transfer, the authority may assume no financial obligations other than those associated with the operation of the airport being transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 20.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170070.

(a) The authority may issue bonds, from time to time, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise operated, acquired, or constructed by the authority, for any of the purposes authorized by this division in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), excluding Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the limitations set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 54402 of the Government Code which shall not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this section.

(b) The authority is a local agency within the meaning of Section 54307 of the Government Code. The airport system or any or all facilities and all additions and improvements that the authority’s governing board authorizes to be acquired or constructed and any purpose, operation, facility, system, improvement, or undertaking of the authority from which revenues are derived or otherwise allocable, which revenues are, or may by resolution or ordinance be, required to be separately accounted for from other revenues of the authority, shall constitute an enterprise within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code.

(c) The authority’s governing board shall authorize the issuance of bonds pursuant to this section by resolution, which resolution shall be adopted by a majority vote and shall specify all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the bonds are to be issued, which may include any one or more purposes permitted by this division.

(2) The maximum principal amount of bonds.

(3) The maximum term of bonds.

(4) The maximum rate of interest, fixed or variable, to be payable upon the bonds.

(5) The maximum discount or premium payable on sale of the bonds.

(d) For purposes of the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this section, the following definitions shall be applicable to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941:

(1) “Fiscal agent” means any fiscal agent, trustee, paying agent, depository or other fiduciary provided for in the resolution providing the terms and conditions for the issuance of the bonds, which fiscal agent may be located within or without the state.

(2) “Resolution” means, unless the context otherwise requires, the instrument providing the terms and conditions for the issuance of bonds, which instrument may be an indenture, trust agreement, installment sale agreement, lease, ordinance, or other instrument in writing.

(e) Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of bonds authorized has been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series with different dates of payment fixed for bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(f) The authority may issue refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the authority upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which the authority’s governing body determines by resolution. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premium, if any due upon call redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of redemption and either of the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(g) The authority may enter into any liquidity or credit agreement it may deem necessary in connection with the issuance of bonds authorized by this section.

(h) This section provides a complete, additional, and alternative method of performing the acts authorized by this section, and the issuance of bonds, including refunding bonds, need not comply with any other law applicable to borrowing or the issuance of bonds. Any provision of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 which is inconsistent with this section or this division shall not be applicable.

(i) Nothing in this section prohibits the authority from availing itself of any procedure provided in this chapter for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the authorized airport facilities. All bond proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the authority may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 21.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170072.

The authority may levy special benefit assessments consistent with the requirements of Article XIIID of the California Constitution to finance capital improvements, including, but not limited to, special benefit assessments levied pursuant to any of the following:

(a) The Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(b) The Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 15 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(c) The Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(d) The Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 22.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170074.

The authority may borrow money in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of, or Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of, Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170076.

(a) The authority may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of any bonds that have been authorized to be issued, but have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor, and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, may not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes. The bond anticipation notes may be paid from any money of the authority available therefor and not otherwise pledged.

(b) If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The bond anticipation notes may not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds that the authority has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefore issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. The bond anticipation notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that a resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(c) Exclusively for the purpose of securing financing or refinancing for any of the purposes permitted by this division through the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations, including certificates of participation, by a joint powers authority, and, notwithstanding any other provision contained in this division or any other law, the authority may borrow money or purchase or lease property from a joint powers authority and, in connection therewith, may sell or lease property to the joint powers authority, in each case at the interest rate or rates, maturity date or dates, installment payment or rental provisions, security, pledge of revenues and other assets, covenants to increase rates and charges, default, remedy and other terms or provisions as may be specified in the installment sale, lease, loan, loan purchase, or other agreement or agreements between the authority and the joint powers authority. The authority may enter into any liquidity or credit agreement it may deem necessary or appropriate in connection with any financing or refinancing authorized by this section. This section provides a complete, additional and alternative method of performing the acts authorized by this section, and the borrowing of money, incurring indebtedness, sale, purchase or lease of property from or to a joint powers authority, and any agreement for liquidity or credit enhancement entered into in connection therewith, pursuant to this section need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to borrowing, incurring indebtedness, sale, purchase, lease or credit except for compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 23.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170078.

The authority may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness or any of its revenues, rates, or charges pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 24.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170082.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the authority of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability constitute a contract between the authority and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof are enforceable against the authority or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Nothing in this division or in any other law shall be held to relieve the authority or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the authority.

(c) Upon dissolution of the authority or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, that territory formerly included within the authority, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of the dissolution or withdrawal as if the authority had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of the bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities.

(d) To the extent provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the authority may be pledged, charged, assigned, and have a lien thereon for the payment of the bonds as long as the same are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in any later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 26.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170084.

The authority shall assume and be bound by the terms and conditions of employment set forth in any collective bargaining agreement or employment contract between the port and any labor organization or employee affected by the creation of the authority, as well as the duties, obligations, and liabilities arising from, or relating to, labor obligations imposed by state or federal law upon the port. Aviation division employees of the port affected by this division shall become employees of the authority and shall suffer no loss of employment or reduction in wages, health and welfare benefits, seniority, retirement benefits or contributions made to retirement plans, or any other term or condition of employment as a result of the enactment of this division. No employee of the port shall suffer loss of employment or reduction in wages or benefits as a result of the enactment of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 36.11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19. LOCAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITIES [180000. - 180305.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [180000. - 180003.]

180000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Local Transportation Authority and Improvement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Local highway and transportation improvements and services are an immediate high priority needed to resolve local and regional transportation problems that threaten the economic viability and development potential of counties and cities and adversely impact the quality of life therein. Furthermore, regional transportation is a matter of statewide concern.

(b) Comprehensive studies and reports have been completed by the Department of Transportation, the Assembly Office of Research, the Governor’s Task Force on Infrastructure, and the California Business Roundtable which conclude that there exists a local city street and county road maintenance backlog and shortfall of between five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) and eight hundred forty million dollars ($840,000,000) annually.

(c) In order to deal in an expeditious manner with current and future local transportation maintenance and improvement needs, local agencies need to develop and implement local funding programs that go significantly beyond current federal and state funding which is inadequate to resolve these problems.

(d) It is in the public interest to allow the voters of each county to establish local transportation authorities and raise additional local revenues to provide highway capital improvements and maintenance and to meet local transportation needs in a timely manner.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds generated pursuant to this division be used to supplement and not replace existing local revenues used for transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180002.

“Authority” means a local transportation authority created or designated pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180003.

This division shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes. No inadvertent error, irregularity, informality, or the inadvertent neglect or omission of any officer, in any procedure taken under this division, other than fraud, shall void or invalidate that proceeding or any levy imposed to finance highway improvements or local transportation needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of Local Transportation Authority [180050. - 180052.]

180050.

A county board of supervisors may create an authority to operate within the county to carry out this division, or may designate a transportation planning agency designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code or created pursuant to the Fresno County Transportation Improvement Act pursuant to Division 15 (commencing with Section 142000), or a county transportation commission created pursuant to the County Transportation Act (Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000)) in existence in the county on January 1, 1988, to serve as an authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

180051.

(a) A board of supervisors that chooses to create an entirely new entity as an authority pursuant to Section 180050 shall determine the membership of the authority with the concurrence of a majority of the cities having a majority of the population in the incorporated area of the county.

(b) Each member of the authority, and each alternate designated pursuant to subdivision (c), shall be an elected official of a local governmental entity within or partly within the county. Members of the board of supervisors serving on an authority shall comprise less than a majority of the authority.

(c) (1) Each member of the authority may have an alternate to vote or otherwise officially participate on behalf of the member at meetings of the authority when the member is not present. Either the member, or the alternate, but not both, may officially participate in a meeting of the authority. An alternate shall be designated as follows:

(A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), the local governmental entity that appointed the member shall designate the alternate.

(B) A member who serves because the member holds a specified public office, as specified in the county transportation expenditure plan, shall designate his or her own alternate.

(2) An alternate acting on behalf of a member has all of the rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

180052.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), members of an authority which is an entirely new entity shall serve for a term of not more than four years.

(b) At the first meeting of an authority which is an entirely new entity convened pursuant to Section 180112 the members shall be selected by lot to serve staggered terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [180100. - 180111.]

180100.

The authority at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the meeting designated by the authority, shall elect a chairperson who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in the absence of the chairperson. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting, shall have all the authority of the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 878, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

180101.

The authority shall adopt rules for its proceedings consistent with the laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180102.

A majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the authority requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180103.

The acts of the authority shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180104.

All meetings of the authority shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180105.

The authority shall do all the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which prescribes the powers and duties of the authority officers, the method of appointment of the authority employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the authority.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the authority to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

The authority may appoint a policy advisory committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180106.

(a) The authority may hire an independent staff of its own or contract with any department or agency of the United States or with any public agency to implement this division.

(b) The authority may contract with private entities in conformance with applicable procurement procedures for the procurement of engineering, project management, and contract management services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180107.

The authority shall fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180108.

(a) Notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code not later than the 15th day prior to the day of the hearing.

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180109.

(a) The authority shall rely, to the extent possible, on existing state, regional, and local transportation planning and programming data and expertise, rather than on a large duplicative staff and set of plans.

(b) The authority shall not expend more than 1 percent of the funds generated pursuant to this division in any year for salary and benefits of its staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180110.

The authority shall consult with, and coordinate its actions to secure funding for the completion and improvement of the priority regional highways, with the cities in the county, the board of supervisors, and the Department of Transportation, for the purpose of integrating its planned highway improvements with the highway and other transportation improvement plans and operations of other transportation agencies impacting the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180111.

The authority shall prepare and adopt an annual report each year on progress made to achieve the objective of improving transportation conditions related to priority highway operations and local transportation needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions [180150. - 180154.]

180150.

The authority may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180151.

All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180152.

The authority may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180153.

The authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States, with any public agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, any county, city, or district, or with any person or a private entity upon any terms and conditions that the authority finds in its best interest for the procurement of engineering, project management, and contract management services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

180154.

(a) Contracts for the purchase of services, supplies, equipment, and materials in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in an emergency declared by the authority or by an executive committee to which the authority has delegated responsibility to make that declaration.

(b) If, after rejecting bids received under subdivision (a), the authority determines and declares that, in its opinion, the services, supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price on the open market, the authority may proceed to purchase these services, supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions regarding contracts, bids, or advertisements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Transactions and Use Taxes [180200. - 180207.]

180200.

The Legislature, by the enactment of this division, intends that the additional funds provided governmental agencies by this chapter shall supplement existing local revenues being used for public transportation purposes and that local governments maintain their existing commitment of local funds for transportation purposes.

The Legislature further intends that transportation authorities utilize “pay-as-you-go” financing as the preferred method of funding transportation improvements and operations authorized by Section 180205, and that bond financing be utilized as an alternative method of funding, where the scope of the planned expenditures makes “pay-as-you-go” financing unfeasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180201.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of a county may be imposed by the authority in accordance with this chapter and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if the tax ordinance is adopted by a two-thirds vote of the authority and imposition of the tax is subsequently approved by a majority of the electors voting on the measure, or by any otherwise applicable voter approval requirement, at a special election called for that purpose by the board of supervisors, at the request of the authority, and a county transportation expenditure plan is adopted pursuant to Section 180206.

A retail transactions and use tax approved by the electors shall remain in effect for the period of time specified in the tax ordinance. The tax may be continued in effect, or reimposed, by a tax ordinance adopted by a two-thirds vote of the authority and the reimposition of the tax is approved by any applicable majority of the electors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

180202.

The authority, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, shall provide the tax rate or the maximum tax rate, shall specify the period during which the tax will be imposed, and shall specify the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used. The tax rate may be in 14 percent increments and shall not exceed a maximum tax rate of 1 percent.

The proposition shall include an appropriations limit for that entity pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180203.

(a) The county shall conduct the special election called by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 180201. If the measure is approved, the authority shall reimburse the county for its cost in conducting the special election.

(b) The special election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of special elections by a county.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), the sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, pursuant to Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition, as set forth in the
 ordinance calling the election, and the voter information guide shall include the entire adopted county transportation expenditure plan.

(2) (A) A county elections official, upon the request of an authority that posts the entire adopted county transportation expenditure plan on an Internet Web site maintained by the authority, may comply with paragraph (1) by printing, in the sample ballot, immediately below the full proposition, and in the voter information guide, in no less than 10-point bold type, text substantially as follows: “The adopted county transportation expenditure plan may be viewed electronically at [insert applicable Internet Web site address]. If you desire a printed copy of the adopted county
 transportation expenditure plan, please call the county elections office at [insert applicable telephone number] and one will be mailed to you at no cost.” If the county elections official exercises the authority under this paragraph, the county elections official shall provide a printed copy of the entire adopted county transportation expenditure plan by mail to each person requesting a copy.

(B) A county that posts the entire adopted county transportation expenditure plan on an Internet Web site pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall ensure that the plan is posted in a manner that is easily accessible to voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   (AB 467)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

180204.

(a) Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 110 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the authority shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incidental to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 129, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

180205.

The revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter may be allocated by the authority for the construction and improvement of state highways, the construction, maintenance, improvement, and operation of local streets, roads, and highways, and the construction, improvement, and operation of public transit systems. For purposes of this section, “public transit systems” includes paratransit services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 962, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

180206.

(a) A county transportation expenditure plan shall be prepared for the expenditure of the revenues expected to be derived from the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter, together with other federal, state, and local funds expected to be available for transportation improvements, for the period during which the tax is to be imposed.

(b) A county transportation expenditure plan shall not be adopted until it has received the approval of the board of supervisors and of the city councils representing both a majority of the cities in the county and a majority of the population residing in the incorporated areas of the county.

(c) The plan shall be adopted prior to the call of the election provided for in Section 180201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180207.

(a) The authority may annually review and propose amendments to the county transportation expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 180206 to provide for the use of additional federal, state, and local funds, to account for unexpected revenues, or to take into consideration unforeseen circumstances.

(b) The authority shall notify the board of supervisors and the city council of each city in the county and provide them with a copy of the proposed amendments.

(c) The proposed amendments shall become effective 45 days after notice is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Bonds [180250. - 180264.]

180250.

(a) As part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, authorization may be sought to issue bonds to finance capital outlay expenditures as may be provided for in the adopted county transportation expenditure plan, payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be outstanding at any one time shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax, as determined by the plan. The amount of bonds outstanding at any one time does not include the amount of bonds, refunding bonds, or bond anticipation notes for which funds necessary for the payment thereof have been set aside for that purpose in a trust or escrow account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180250.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, together with the establishment of an appropriations limit of seven hundred sixty-five million dollars ($765,000,000), was approved by the voters of a county pursuant to Section 180250 on November 8, 1988, and if the ordinance adopted by the authority which requested the board of supervisors to submit the proposition for approval of that tax and appropriations limit by the voters authorized the issuance of bonds payable from that tax, that authority may issue bonds, refunding bonds, or bond anticipation notes pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1232, Sec. 2.   Effective October 1, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

180251.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued at any time by the authority and shall be payable from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.” The bonds may be secured by a pledge of revenues from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter shall have priority over the use of any of the tax for “pay-as-you-go” financing, except to the extent that that priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180252.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time by a two-thirds vote of the authority. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of bonds authorized have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180253.

(a) A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to, or connected with, the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not be beyond the date of termination of the imposition of the retail transactions and use tax.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when all of, or any part of, the principal becomes due and payable.

(b) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this chapter or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180254.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable at intervals determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180255.
